Louisiana, session 2026, HB149.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of United States Highway 190 Business East in Slidell,
Louisiana, beginning at the intersection of Beech Avenue and East Interstate 10 Service
Road and United States Highway 190 and ending at the intersection of United States
Highway 190 East and Military Road shall be known and is hereby designated as the "Senior
Police Officer Trevor Abney Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development is hereby directed
to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation provided local or private
monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual costs for material,
fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to exceed the sum of two
thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1